tests/data/oci-pgen.dix
<pardef n="apostrofenperdarrere">

 <e>
	 <p>
		 <l><b/><a/>me</l>
		 <r>m</r>
	 </p>
	 <par n="me_te"/>
 </e>
 <e>
	 <p>
		 <l><b/><a/>te</l>
		 <r>t</r>
	 </p>
	 <par n="me_te"/>
 </e>

 <e>
	 <p>
		 <l><b/><a/>li<b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
		 <r>li</r>
	 </p>
	 <par n="en_apostrofat"/>
 </e>
 <e>
	 <p>
		 <l><b/><a/>li<b/><a/></l>
		 <r>l'</r>
	 </p>
	 <par n="li_ac"/>
 </e>
 <e>
	 <p>
		 <l><b/><a/>les<b/><a/></l>
		 <r>les<b/></r>
	 </p>
	 <par n="les_ac"/>
	</e> 
<e>
	<p>
		<l><b/><a/>se</l>
		<r>s</r>
	</p>
	<par n="apostrof_e"/>
</e>
<e>
	<p>
		<l><b/><a/>ne</l>
		<r/>
	</p>
	<par n="apostrof_en"/>
</e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="de"> 
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>e</l>
			<r>de</r>
		</p>
		<par n="contrac_det"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>del<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>dels<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlo</l>
			<r>del</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla</l>
			<r>de<b/>la</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlos</l>
			<r>dels</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlas</l>
			<r>de<b/>las</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/></l>
			<r>d'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors_de"/>
	</e> 
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>d'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors_de"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>me</l>
			<r>de<b/>m</r>
		</p>
		<par n="me_te"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>te</l>
			<r>de<b/>t</r>
		</p>
		<par n="me_te"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>se</l>
			<r>de<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ne</l>
			<r>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_en"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>lo<b/><a/>i<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'i<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>la<b/><a/>i<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'i<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>la<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>de<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>de<b/>se</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>de<b/>se</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prnera</l>
			<r>d'era</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneth</l>
			<r>d'eth</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneras</l>
			<r>d'eras</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneths</l>
			<r>d'eths</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneres</l>
			<r>d'eres</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneri</l>
			<r>d'eri</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="tant"/>
	</e>
</pardef> 

<pardef n="de_gascon"> 
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>e</l>
			<r>de</r>
		</p>
		<par n="contrac_det"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>deu<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlo<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>la<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlos<b/></l>
			<r>deus<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlas<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>las<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlo</l>
			<r>deu</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla</l>
			<r>de<b/>la</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlos</l>
			<r>deus</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detlas</l>
			<r>de<b/>las</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/></l>
			<r>d'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors_de"/>
	</e> 
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>d'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofadors_de"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>me<b/></l>
			<r>de'm<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>me<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>m'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>m</l>
			<r>de<b/>m</r>
		</p>
		<par n="me_te_se_gascon"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>te<b/></l>
			<r>de't<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>te<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>t'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>t</l>
			<r>de<b/>t</r>
		</p>
		<par n="me_te_se_gascon"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>se<b/></l>
			<r>de's<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>se<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>s'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>s</l>
			<r>de<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="me_te_se_gascon"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>de'u<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>la<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>los<b/></l>
			<r>de'us<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>nos<b/></l>
			<r>de'ns<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>nse<b/></l>
			<r>de'ns<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>nos<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>ns'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>nse<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>ns'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>vos<b/></l>
			<r>de'vs<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>vse<b/></l>
			<r>de'vs<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>vos<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>vs'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>vse<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>vs'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ac<b/></l>
			<r>d'ac<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>n'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ne<b/></l>
			<r>de'n<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>ne</l>
			<r>de'n</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="ne_gascon"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>lo<b/><a/>i<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'i<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>la<b/><a/>i<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'i<b/></r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>lo<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>la<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>

	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>de<b/>s</r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrof_e"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>de<b/>se</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>cnjse</l>
			<r>de<b/>se</r>
		</p>
		<par n="caracter_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>detla<b/></l>
			<r>de<b/>l'</r>
		</p>
		<par n="vocal_general"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prnera</l>
			<r>d'era</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneth</l>
			<r>d'eth</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneras</l>
			<r>d'eras</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneths</l>
			<r>d'eths</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneres</l>
			<r>d'eres</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/><a/>prneri</l>
			<r>d'eri</r>
		</p>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><b/></l>
			<r>de<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="tant"/>
	</e>
</pardef> 

	<e>
	  <p>
		  <l><a/>de</l>
		  <r/>
	  </p>
	  <par n="de"/>
	</e>
	<e>
	  <p>
		  <l><a/>a<b/><a/>de</l>
		  <r>a<b/></r>
	  </p>
	  <par n="de"/>
	</e>
	<e>
	  <p>
		  <l><a/>jos<b/><a/>de</l>
		  <r>jos<b/></r>
	  </p>
	  <par n="de"/>
	</e>
	<e>
	  <p>
		  <l><a/>sus<b/><a/>de</l>
		  <r>sus<b/></r>
	  </p>
	  <par n="de"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que</l>
			<r>que<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="apostrofenperdarrere"/>
	</e>
	<e>
		<p>
			<l><a/>que<b/><a/>de</l>
			<r>que<b/></r>
		</p>
		<par n="de"/>
	</e>
